California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) During the year, a recipient described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45 may request that the county discontinue the recipient’s entire assistance unit or any individual member of the assistance unit who is no longer in the home or is an optional member of the assistance unit. If the recipient’s request is verbal, the county shall provide a 10-day notice before discontinuing benefits. If the recipient’s request is in writing, the county shall discontinue benefits effective the end of the month in which the request is made, and simultaneously shall issue a notice informing
 the recipient of the discontinuance.

(g) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2020, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 44.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Section operative on or after June 1, 2020, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.48.

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, regulations, waivers, and directives, the department shall implement Sections 11265.45, 11265.46, and 11265.47 in a cost-effective manner that promotes compatibility between the CalWORKs program and CalFresh, and minimizes the potential for payment errors.

(b) The department shall seek all necessary waivers from the United States Department of Agriculture to implement subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall become operative on the first day of the first month following 90 days after the effective date of the act that added this section, or October 1,
 2012, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 10.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section operative October 1, 2012, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.6.

(a) The department may conduct up to five demonstrations of alternatives to the current monthly reporting system, CalFresh recertification, and AFDC redeterminations. These demonstrations shall be designed to reduce paperwork, achieve administrative savings, and maintain or enhance program integrity. The department, in consultation with the counties that request designation as a demonstration county, shall determine the scope of the demonstrations.

(b) The director may waive, with federal approval, the enforcement of specific federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program requirements, regulations, and standards necessary to conduct these
 demonstrations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 46.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.7.

(a) The department may conduct a demonstration in up to three counties of alternatives to the current monthly reporting system, CalFresh recertification, and AFDC redeterminations for recipients of alternative assistance. This demonstration shall be designed to reduce paperwork, achieve administrative savings, and maintain or enhance program integrity. The department, in consultation with the counties which request designation as a demonstration county shall determine the scope of the demonstrations.

(b) The director may waive, with federal approval, the enforcement of specific federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program requirements, regulations, and standards necessary to
 conduct these demonstrations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 47.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.8.

(a) All applicants for aid under this chapter, within 30 days of the determination of eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), and 45 days for applicants already eligible for benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), and all recipients of aid under this chapter within 45 days of a full or financial redetermination of eligibility for aid under this chapter, shall provide documentation that all children in the assistance unit not required to be enrolled in school have received all age appropriate immunizations, unless it has been medically determined that an immunization for a child is not appropriate or the applicant or recipient has filed with the county welfare department an affidavit that the immunizations are contrary to the applicant’s or recipient’s beliefs. If
 the county determines that good cause exists for not providing the required documentation due to lack of reasonable access to immunization services, the period shall be extended by an additional 30 days. A circumstance that shall constitute good cause includes, but is not limited to, the applicant or recipient does not have reasonable access to immunization services due to a situation of domestic violence. If the documentation is not provided within the required time period, the needs of all parents or caretaker relatives in the assistance unit shall not be considered in determining the grant to the assistance unit under Section 11450 until the required documentation is provided. The department shall track and maintain information concerning the number of sanctions imposed under this section.

(b) At the time of application and at the next redetermination of eligibility for aid under this chapter, all applicants and recipients shall be given
 notice advising them of their obligation to secure the immunizations required in subdivision (a). The notice shall also contain all of the following:

(1) The Recommended Childhood Immunization Schedule, United States, and the Recommended Immunization Schedule for Children Not Immunized on Schedule in the First Year of Life, as appropriate, approved as of January 1, 2025, by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices, the American Academy of Pediatrics, and the American Academy of Family Physicians, and any modification or supplement thereto by the State Department of Public Health, including the recommended immunization schedule, in accordance with Section
 120164 of Health and Safety Code. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement any policy changes required pursuant to this paragraph by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations, which shall occur no later than June 30, 2027.

(2) A description of how to obtain the immunizations through a fee-for-service provider that accepts Medi-Cal, a Medi-Cal managed care plan, a county public health clinic, or any other source that may be available in the county as appropriate.

(3) A statement that the
 applicant or recipient may file an affidavit claiming that the immunizations are contrary to the applicant’s or recipient’s beliefs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 50.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.9.

Whenever aid to an individual or family is discontinued under this chapter for any reason other than fraud, the department shall include, in the notice of termination of aid, a brief summary of the requirements for transitional Medi-Cal benefits provided for pursuant to Sections 14005.8, 14005.81, and 14005.85, and Section 50243 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, as well as a form that the individual or family may fill out and return to request transitional Medi-Cal benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 68.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

11266.

(a) At the time of application, the county shall determine whether the applicant needs immediate assistance because the applicant does not have sufficient resources to meet their emergency needs, and shall determine whether the applicant is apparently eligible for aid under this chapter.

(1) The county shall determine that the applicant needs immediate assistance if the family’s total available liquid resources, both nonexempt and exempt, are less than one hundred dollars ($100) and there is an emergency situation, whether foreseeable or not. Examples of emergency situations include, but are not limited to, lack of housing, lack of food, notice of termination or loss of utility service, lack of essential clothing (including diapers), and inability to meet
 essential transportation needs.

(2) Apparent eligibility exists when evidence presented by the applicant or which is otherwise available to the county welfare department and the information provided on the application documents indicate that there would be eligibility for aid under this chapter if the evidence and information were verified. An applicant who is not a citizen or national of the United States and who does not provide verification of their eligible immigration status shall not be considered to be apparently eligible under this subdivision.

(b) If an applicant needs immediate
 assistance, and is apparently eligible for aid as defined in subdivision (a), the county shall pay the applicant two hundred dollars ($200) or the maximum amount for which that applicant is eligible, whichever is less. The advance payment shall be made by the end of the first working day following the request for that aid. The county shall verify the applicant’s eligibility for aid within 15 working days of the date that immediate need is requested, and advance payments made under this section shall be offset against the first grant payment made to the recipient.

(c) An applicant’s receipt of a notice of eviction, including a three-day notice to pay or quit, shall constitute an emergency situation under subdivision (a), irrespective of the one hundred dollar ($100) resource test, if the applicant has insufficient income or resources to pay the rent owing. In those cases, the county shall give the applicant the option of receiving an immediate
 advance on the grant as described in subdivision (b), or an expedited determination of eligibility for aid. Before an applicant decides between these two options, the county shall fully apprise the applicant, in writing, of all information necessary to establish eligibility for aid. If an applicant requests expedited determination of eligibility for aid, the county shall complete the determination of eligibility for aid under this chapter, and, if the applicant is determined to be eligible, issue payment of the full prorated grant no more than three working days from the request for immediate need. If the eligibility determination is not made within this three-day period, the county shall immediately pay the applicant two hundred dollars ($200) or the maximum amount for which the applicant is eligible, whichever is less, as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b). The county shall verify the applicant’s eligibility within 15 working days of the date of the request for immediate assistance, and advance payments
 made under this subdivision shall be offset against the first grant payment made to the recipient.

(d) (1) The county may deny an immediate advance payment if the applicant’s only immediate need is homelessness and this need will be met by issuance of nonrecurring special needs payment in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 11450, or if the applicant’s only immediate need is lack of food and this need will be met by issuance of CalFresh benefits within one working day of the request therefor. With regard to all other immediate needs, an advance payment may be denied and the applicant referred to another public or private program or resource, if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) Not more than one referral is made and the referral, when made, is to meet no more than one need.

(B) The county has verified in advance that the specific need can be satisfactorily addressed by the other program or resource immediately.

(C) Travel to the other program or resource will not impose a hardship on the applicant.

(2) If, for any reason, the other program or resource does not satisfactorily meet the applicant’s need, the applicant shall be immediately issued an advance payment, as specified in subdivision (b).

(3) Except in the case of an applicant whose only need is lack of food and the need is met with the issuance of CalFresh benefits within one working day of the request, where an applicant’s immediate need is met by an alternative program or resource authorized in this subdivision, the county shall verify the applicant’s eligibility for aid within 15 working days of the date of
 request.

(e) A denial of an immediate need application shall not constitute a denial of the application for aid unless it is based upon the failure to meet relevant eligibility requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 42.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11266.5.

(a) Every applicant for aid under this chapter shall be informed of the availability of lump-sum diversion services to resolve the circumstances that require the family to apply for assistance prior to the family’s approval for aid.

(b) When an applicant is determined to be eligible for assistance under this chapter, the county shall assess whether the applicant would benefit from the lump-sum diversion program. The county shall make this determination in its sole discretion. In making this determination, the county shall consider whether the applicant is likely to be able to avoid the need for extended assistance beyond the diversion period if the family was provided one-time assistance. In making this determination, the
 county may consider any of the following:

(1) The applicant’s employment history.

(2) The likelihood of the applicant obtaining immediate full-time employment.

(3) The applicant’s general prospect for obtaining full-time employment.

(4) The applicant’s need for cash assistance to pay for housing or substantial and unforeseen expenses or work-related expenses.

(5) Housing stability.

(6) The adequacy of the applicant’s child care arrangements, if applicable.

(c) If the county determines, pursuant to subdivision (b), that an applicant could benefit from a lump-sum
 diversion payment, the county shall inform the applicant of its determination.

(d) An applicant for aid under this chapter may either participate in the lump-sum diversion program or decline participation in diversion and, instead, receive aid as otherwise provided for in this chapter.

(e) Lump-sum diversion services provided under this section may include any cash or noncash payment and shall be negotiated by the county and the applicant in order to assist the applicant in avoiding the need for aid under this chapter.

(f) If, after accepting a diversion payment pursuant to this section, the individual reapplies for aid under this chapter within the amount of time that corresponds with the number of months of aid that would have been received under this chapter that was received as a diversion payment, excluding a
 partial month, and he or she is determined to be eligible for aid, the county shall, at the option of the recipient, either recoup from the recipient’s grant, over a period of time to be determined by the county, the amount of the diversion payment that the recipient received, or count the period of time that corresponds to the number of months of aid that would have been received, excluding a partial month of aid, towards the time limits on aid specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11454.

(g) To the extent permitted by federal law, lump-sum diversion payments shall not be considered income for the purpose of determining eligibility for CalFresh benefits.

(h) Any child support collected by the applicant or recovered by the county shall not be used to offset the diversion payment.

(i) During the period of the
 diversion, the applicant family shall be eligible for Medi-Cal and child care assistance pursuant to Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of the Education Code, if otherwise eligible.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 8, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 49.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11268.

(a) Each applicant for or recipient of aid shall be required as a condition of eligibility, to furnish the applicant’s social security account number (or numbers, if the applicant has more than one social security account number) or submit verification of application for a social security account number.

(b) (1) If the applicant or recipient cannot complete the application for a social security account number because the necessary documentation is not immediately available, the county shall determine if good cause exists.

(2) For purposes of this section, “good cause” includes situations in which the necessary documentation for the application for a social security account number is not immediately available at the time of application.

(c) (1) If good cause exists, and the applicant or recipient is otherwise eligible, the applicant or recipient is eligible for assistance pursuant to this section for the maximum period permitted by federal law, while he or she attempts to obtain the necessary documents to complete the application.

(2) The federal time period shall apply to all recipients of aid, whether or not federal financial assistance is available.

(3) The county shall make every effort to assist the individual in obtaining the documents required by
 this section.

(d) The department shall adopt regulations in accord with federal law regarding applications for the social security account number and the definition of good cause.

(e) The county shall utilize the social security account numbers in the administration of aid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11269.

A child who is a patient in a public or private hospital for medical or surgical care shall be considered temporarily absent from the home for the duration of the hospital stay.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 293, Sec. 2.   (AB 419)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11270.

Applicants for and recipients of Aid to Families with Dependent Children who are not exempt from registration under Section 11310 and who are apparently eligible for unemployment insurance shall, as a condition of eligibility, apply for, meet all the conditions of eligibility for, and accept any unemployment insurance benefits for which the Employment Development Department determines they are eligible. Upon determination that individuals registered under Section 11310 have failed to meet all the conditions of eligibility for unemployment insurance, the county shall make a good cause determination under standards established by
 the department. These standards shall be the same as those which govern the Work Incentive Program. Applicants and recipients who are exempt from work registration under Section 11310 and who are apparently eligible for unemployment insurance benefits shall, as a condition of eligibility, apply for and accept any unemployment insurance benefits for which the Employment Development Department determines they are eligible. The department shall establish by regulations the standards to determine apparent eligibility for unemployment insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1037, Sec. 4.   Effective September 14, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.2. Restricted Payments [11271. - 11274.]

11271.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Restricted payment” means payment of homeless assistance benefits in the form of either of the following: 

(1) A vendor payment to the provider of shelter or utilities or both. 

(2) A two-party payment for rent or utilities, or both. 

(b) “Recipient” means a recipient of aid pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11450. 

(c) “Two-party payment” means a check which is drawn jointly to the order of the recipient and the service provider and is negotiable only upon the endorsement of both parties. 

(d) “Vendor payment” means a voucher, or check drawn to the order of the service provider. 

(e)“Homeless assistance benefits” means benefits paid pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450 and Section 11450.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 3.5.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative August 1, 1991, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

11271.5.

(a) Restricted payments for homeless assistance benefits shall be provided by a county welfare department to a recipient, if at least one of the following criteria is met: 

(1) The recipient has mismanaged AFDC funds, as defined in Section 11273 and in accordance with federal law. 

(2) The recipient has voluntarily requested restricted payments. The request shall be in writing from the recipient and shall be recorded and retained in the case file by the county welfare department. 

(b) At the option of the county welfare department, restricted payments made pursuant to subdivision (a) may be made for utilities as well as shelter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 3.5.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative August 1, 1991, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

11272.

When restricted payments are provided to a recipient, the county welfare department shall do all of the following:

(a) Issue the vendor or two-party payment by one of the following methods, at the discretion of the county: 

(1) Mail or delivery to the recipient for delivery to the service provider. 

(2) Mail or delivery directly to the service provider.

(b) Do the following in order to develop greater ability on the part of the recipient to manage funds in such a manner as to protect the welfare of the family: 

(1) Provide each family with informational materials designed to improve the recipient’s ability to manage funds. 

(2) Refer the family to appropriate services where these exist. 

(c) Provide for timely and correct vendor payments and two-party payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 3.5.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative August 1, 1991, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

11273.

(a) Homeless assistance provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450 shall be subject to restricted payments consistent with federal regulations when the county welfare department has made a determination that mismanagement exists. Instances where mismanagement exists include, but are not limited to, the following situations. 

(1) Nonpayment of rent unless nonpayment is due to: 

(i) A rent increase which results in the recipient’s share of the rent being over 80 percent of the maximum aid payable pursuant to Section 11450. 

(ii) Domestic violence by a spouse, partner, or roommate. 

(iii) Reasonable exercise of a tenant’s right to withhold rent for cause. 

(2) The homeless assistance payment was not used for shelter. 

(3) The recipient or applicant fails to provide verification that homeless assistance payments were used for shelter. 

(b) To the extent allowed by federal law, the department is authorized to issue regulations defining additional situations when mismanagement may exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 3.5.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative August 1, 1991, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

11274.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11271, for purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “AFDC” benefits means benefits paid pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11450.

(2) “Recipient” means a recipient of aid pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11450.

(3) “Restricted payment” means payment of AFDC benefits in the form of any of the following:

(A) A vendor payment to the provider of shelter or utilities, or both.

(B) A two-party payment for rent or utilities, or both.

(4) “Two-party payment” means a check that is drawn jointly to the order of the recipient and the service provider and is negotiable only upon the endorsement of both parties.

(5) “Vendor payment” means a voucher or check drawn to the order of the service provider.

(b) A county may, at its option, provide restricted payments for AFDC on behalf of a recipient to the provider of shelter or utilities, or both, if the county determines that the recipient has demonstrated such an inability to manage funds that payments to the relative have not been or are not currently used in the best interest of the child. A recipient shall be presumed to have mismanaged funds when he or she has previously failed to pay rent within the past 12 months, unless the failure was due to a significant rent increase, a reasonable exercise of a tenant’s right to withhold rent for repair and deduct, or domestic violence by a spouse, partner, or roommate.

(c) If the county, at its option, elects to establish a program to provide restricted payments to the provider of shelter or utilities, or both, the county shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide restricted payments on behalf of recipients who request them, in addition to making involuntary restricted payments to those persons to whom subdivision (b) applies.

(2) Continue voluntary restricted payments for not less than three months, unless the county determines that exceptional circumstances exist that require that the restricted payments be ended earlier.

(3) If a recipient notifies the county at least two weeks prior to the issuance of the next regular rental payment that he or she wishes to exercise his or her right to withhold rent due to untenantable conditions, issue a two-party check to the recipient requiring endorsement of both the landlord and the recipient.

(4) If a recipient notifies the county at least two weeks prior to the issuance of the next regular rental payment that he or she wishes to exercise his or her right to repair and deduct the money pursuant to Section 1942 of the Civil Code, and the amount the tenant wishes to deduct, deduct that amount from the restricted payment to the landlord and add the amount to the recipient’s grant check.

(5) If a recipient notifies the county at least two weeks prior to the issuance of the next regular rental payment that he or she intends to move, provide the next regular rental payment to the new landlord. If the recipient indicates his or her intent to move but does not provide the name and address of the new landlord, the county shall terminate restricted payments for rent until the name and address of a new landlord is provided.

(d) (1) In no case is a landlord entitled to payment under this section for days that the recipient was not residing at the landlord’s property.

(2) If a landlord does receive a restricted payment pursuant to this section for days that the recipient did not reside at the landlord’s property, the landlord shall remit to the county welfare department an amount that represents the overpaid rent.

(3) The county may not assess an overpayment against a recipient for payments made to a landlord for periods in which the recipient was not residing at that location.

(4) A landlord may not base an eviction or late fee upon failure to receive rent due to county administrative error.

(5) If the notice from the recipient is given less than two weeks prior to a move, the county shall pay the new landlord as soon as practicable.

(6) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prevent a landlord accepting restricted payments from pursuing existing remedies against a tenant or former tenant for money that may be owed by the tenant to the landlord.

(e) Restricted payments shall expire after a period of 12 months, unless the recipient requests a continuation of that period or the county finds that the recipient continues to experience money management problems. The county shall provide notification to the recipient within 30 days of the expiration of the restricted payment.

(f) When restricted payments are provided on behalf of a recipient, the county welfare department shall do all of the following:

(1) Either of the following:

(A) Mail or deliver the voucher or check to the recipient for delivery to the service provider.

(B) Mail or deliver the voucher or check directly to the service provider.

(2) Provide timely notification to the recipient that the restricted payment has been made.

(3) Refer the family to appropriate money management services, where those services exist.

(g) If the restricted payment involves a third party, the third-party payee shall be an individual or organization interested in, or concerned with, the recipient’s welfare, and shall not include any employees of the county welfare department or parties who are vendors who stand to gain financially from doing commercial business with the recipient. To the extent possible, the selection of a third-party payee shall be made by the recipient, or with his or her participation and consent.

(h) Any landlord who accepts a restricted payment of AFDC benefits shall not require his or her tenant to pay the last month’s rent in advance or retain any portion of the tenant’s security deposit as rent owing.

(i) (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a landlord who accepts a restricted payment of rent pursuant to this section from charging a cleaning or damage deposit, or a deposit for both cleaning and damage, in an amount that does not exceed an amount equal to rent for one month.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the rights of tenants provided under Section 1942 of the Civil Code.

(j) (1) The department shall seek all appropriate federal waivers for the implementation of this section.

(2) The department shall implement this section commencing on the date the Director of Social Services executes a declaration, that shall be retained by the director, stating that the administrative actions required by paragraph (1) as a condition of implementation of subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive, have been taken by the director and the waivers have been obtained from the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 838, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Needy Families’ Paperwork Reduction Act of 1990 [11275. - 11275.50.]

11275.

(a) Only verification of information necessary to determine past or present eligibility for or the computation of or delivery of aid shall be requested from an applicant for or recipient of aid under this chapter. Additional information necessary for the administration of the AFDC program may be requested, but the individual’s eligibility for aid shall not be delayed, denied, or terminated due to his or her inability to provide this information.

(b) Within 10 days from the date of application, the county shall identify and provide written notice of documents and alternative documents, if applicable, that may be submitted to verify eligibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.05.

(a) Whenever a former recipient of aid applies for aid before the expiration of one year from the effective date of discontinuance, the county shall examine the existing case file to determine if the necessary verification is in the possession of the county if any of the following criteria is present:

(1) The applicant does not have easy access to the verification.

(2) There is a cost associated with obtaining the verification.

(3) The time needed to obtain the verification would delay the application.

(b) The county shall not be required to examine the existing case file if it would be unreasonable to expect the file to contain the needed verification because the circumstance for which the verification is needed did not exist during the period the applicant previously received aid.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), whenever a former recipient of aid applies for aid within the calendar month following the effective date of a discontinuance, a county shall not require the former recipient to furnish any documentation previously provided to the county unless the documentation is absent from the existing file and the documentation affects eligibility or the amount of aid.

(d) The retrieval and examination of the file shall be conducted in a timely manner to ensure the prompt determination of eligibility for aid.

(e) At the time an applicant described in subdivisions (a) and (c) is requested to obtain and submit to the county verification of eligibility, the county shall inform the applicant, in writing, of the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.10.

(a) When an applicant or recipient establishes that he or she has made a good faith effort to obtain information or verification from a third party, including any other public agency, and the third party fails or refuses to provide the information or verification or seeks to impose a charge or fee for providing the information to the applicant or recipient, the county shall assist the applicant or recipient in obtaining the information or verification from the third party, and when necessary, shall obtain the document.

(b) If it is necessary to pay a fee imposed by a third party to obtain the information or verification, the county shall pay that fee on behalf of the applicant or recipient.

(c) If the county finds that he or she has not made a good faith effort to obtain the information or verification, it shall document its reasons for the finding in the client’s file.

(d) Any notice requesting verification shall clearly inform applicants and recipients of the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.15.

No application for aid may be denied for failure to provide verification if the applicant is cooperating in obtaining the information requested, except as required by Section 11268.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.20.

(a) If an applicant is denied assistance solely due to failure to provide verification of eligibility, but subsequently submits all required verifications within 30 days of the date of the denial notice, denial shall be rescinded, and if eligibility is approved, aid shall be granted based on the original application.

(b) The notice of denial of aid for failure to provide verification of eligibility shall advise the applicant of his or her right to have the denial rescinded if he or she meets the requirements of this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.25.

If any provision of this article is in conflict with any federal statute or regulation, it shall be inapplicable to the extent of the conflict, but the remainder of the article shall be unaffected to the extent that no conflict exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.30.

(a) In the event of an initial determination by the Secretary of Health and Human Services that any provision of this section is in conflict with any federal statute or regulation, the department shall take all available and necessary steps to obtain a final determination reversing that decision.

(b) In the event of a final determination finding a conflict with federal law, the department shall immediately request the Attorney General to seek judicial review of the determination and shall immediately notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature.

(c) (1) If federal funds are withheld based on a determination by the United States Department of Health and Human Services that any provision of this article conflicts with federal law, the department may adopt emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, if necessary to avoid withholding of federal reimbursement.

(2) The adoption of regulations for that purpose shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this paragraph shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law, and shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(d) The department shall continue to implement provisions of this article which are unaffected by the determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.35.

(a) If the determination that all or any provision of this article conflicts with federal law is reversed, the department shall reinstate the provision or provisions it had ceased implementing as a result of the withholding of funds, and may adopt emergency regulations for that purpose.

(b) The adoption of regulations for purposes of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law, and shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.40.

This article applies to all applicants for, and recipients of, aid under this chapter, regardless of whether federal financial participation is available for the family.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.45.

(a) This article shall be applied prospectively only, and shall apply only with respect to applications for aid made on or after July 1, 1991.

(b) This section shall not prohibit a county welfare department from verifying information provided prior to July 1, 1991, in the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.50.

The State Department of Social Services shall consult with the County Welfare Directors Association when developing state budget estimates on the administrative funds necessary to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  [ARTICLE 3.2. Greater Avenues for Independence Act of 1985] [11320.33. - 11320.33.]

11320.33.

(a) The county shall provide training for those county employees who are responsible for the provision of, or arrangement of, child care services under this article which are exempt from licensure.

(b) The training required by subdivision (a) shall include training in the following:

(1) Evaluation of child care providers, using the criteria specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 11320.3.
